Idaho, session 2026, H0579.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-4009, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-4009. JUSTIFIABLE HOMICIDE BY ANY PERSON. (1) Homicide is justifi-
able when committed by any person in any of the following cases:
(a) When resisting any attempt to murder any person, or to commit a
felony, or to do some great bodily injury upon any person;
(b) When committed in defense of habitation, a place of business or
employment, occupied vehicle, property or person, against one who
manifestly intends or endeavors, by violence or surprise, to commit a
felony, or against one who manifestly intends and endeavors, in a vio-
lent, riotous or tumultuous manner, to enter the habitation, place of
business or employment or occupied vehicle of another for the purpose of
offering violence to any person therein;
(c) When committed in the lawful defense of such person, or of a wife
or husband, parent, child, master, mistress or servant of such person
another person, when there is reasonable ground to apprehend a design to
commit a felony or to do some great bodily injury, and imminent danger of
such design being accomplished; but such person, or the person in whose
behalf the defense was made, if he was the assailant or engaged in mor-
tal combat, must really and in good faith have endeavored to decline any
further struggle before the homicide was committed; or
(d) When necessarily committed in attempting, by lawful ways and means,
to apprehend any person for any felony committed, or in lawfully sup-
pressing any riot, or in lawfully keeping and preserving the peace.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, a person who un-
lawfully and by force or by stealth enters or attempts to enter a habitation,
place of business or employment or occupied vehicle is presumed to be doing
so with the intent to commit a felony.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Habitation" means any building, inhabitable structure or con-
veyance of any kind, whether the building, inhabitable structure or
conveyance is temporary or permanent, mobile or immobile, including a
tent, and is designed to be occupied by people lodging therein at night,
and includes a dwelling in which a person resides either temporarily or
permanently or is visiting as an invited guest, and includes the cur-
tilage of any such dwelling.


(b) "Place of business or employment" means a commercial enterprise or
establishment owned by a person as all or part of the person's liveli-
hood or is under the owner's control or under control of an employee or
agent of the owner with responsibility for protecting persons and prop-
erty and shall include the interior and exterior premises of the place
of business or employment.
(c) "Vehicle" means any motorized vehicle that is self-propelled and
designed for use on public highways to transport people or property.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.